Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.230.095

Essential academic learning requirements and assessments—Verification reports.

(1) By the end of the 2008-09 school year, school districts shall have in place in elementary schools, middle schools, and high schools assessments or other strategies chosen by the district to assure that students have an opportunity to learn the essential academic learning requirements in social studies, the arts, and health and fitness. Social studies includes history, geography, civics, economics, and social studies skills. Health and fitness includes, but is not limited to, mental health and suicide prevention education. Beginning with the 2008-09 school year, school districts shall annually submit an implementation verification report to the office of the superintendent of public instruction. The office of the superintendent of public instruction may not require school districts to use a classroom-based assessment in social studies, the arts, and health and fitness to meet the requirements of this section and shall clearly communicate to districts their option to use other strategies chosen by the district.

(2) Beginning with the 2008-09 school year, school districts shall require students in the seventh or eighth grade, and the eleventh or twelfth grade to each complete at least one classroom-based assessment in civics. Beginning with the 2010-11 school year, school districts shall require students in the fourth or fifth grade to complete at least one classroom-based assessment in civics. The civics assessment may be selected from a list of classroom-based assessments approved by the office of the superintendent of public instruction. Beginning with the 2008-09 school year, school districts shall annually submit implementation verification reports to the office of the superintendent of public instruction documenting the use of the classroom-based assessments in civics.

(3) Verification reports shall require school districts to report only the information necessary to comply with this section.

[ 2011 c 185 s 5; 2009 c 556 s 8; 2006 c 113 s 2; 2004 c 19 s 203.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2011 c 185 s 5: "Section 5 of this act takes effect July 1, 2012." [ 2011 c 185 s 6.]

Finding—2011 c 185: See note following RCW 28A.300.2851.

Findings—2006 c 113: "The legislature finds that instruction in social studies, arts, health, and fitness is important to ensure a well-rounded and complete education. In particular, the civic mission of schools is strengthened and enhanced by comprehensive civics education and assessments. The legislature finds that effective and accountable democratic government depends upon an informed and engaged citizenry, and therefore, students should learn their rights and responsibilities as citizens, where those rights and responsibilities come from, and how to exercise them." [ 2006 c 113 s 1.]

Part headings and captions not law—Effective date—2004 c 19: See notes following RCW 28A.230.090.